lexc/num/enhunum1.lexc
LEXICON Num4
millió AddNummil; 
millió:milliom AddNummilliom;
milliós AddNumat;
milliárd AddNum; 
milliárdos AddNumat;
billiárd AddNum; 
billiárdos AddNumat;
billió AddNummil; 
billió:billiom AddNummilliom;
billiós AddNumat;
trillió AddNummil; 
trillió:trilliom AddNummilliom;
trilliós AddNumat;
trilliárd AddNum; 
trilliárdos AddNumat;
kvadrillió AddNummil; 
kvadrillió:kvadrilliom AddNummilliom;
kvadrilliós AddNumat;
kvintillió AddNummil;
kvintilliárd AddNum; 
szextillió AddNummil;
szextilliárd AddNum; 
szeptillió AddNummil;
szeptilliárd AddNum; 
oktillió AddNummil;
oktilliárd AddNum; 
nonillió AddNummil;
nonilliárd AddNum; 
decillió AddNummil;
decilliárd AddNum; 
tucat AddNum;
   Num3;

LEXICON Num5
mindkettő AddNummar; 
mindkettő:mindketteje AddNummkette; 
mindkettő:mindkettejük AddNummkette; 
mindkettő:mindkét AddNumket;
mindkettő:mindkett AddNumkett2; ! od odszor odik
mindhárom AddNummarharom;
mindhárom:mindhárm AddNumhar; 
mindhárom:mindharm AddNumkettharom; 
csomó AddNum;
több AddNum;
többszáz AddNum;
többszáznyi AddNum;
többezer AddNum;
többezernyi AddNum;
legtöbb AddNum;
legeslegtöbb AddNum;
nulla AddNum;

LEXICON AddNum
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Poss;
+Num:0     Plur;
+Num:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenr§d       Szor;  ! od,ed,öd
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Sub;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen1;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;
LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Szor
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Sub;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc;  ! ik
                            #;

LEXICON Sub
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! i
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;

LEXICON AddNumat
+Num:0     Possat;
+Num:0     Plurat;
+Num:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenr§d       Szor;  ! od,ed,öd
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Sub;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1;

LEXICON Plurat
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§AA§k    Gen;
                            Gen1;

LEXICON AddNummil
+Num:0     Possmil;
+Num:0     Plurmil;
+Num:0     Fammil;

LEXICON Possmil
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenr§d       Szormil;  ! od,ed,öd
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Submil;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fammil;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fammil;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fammil;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fammil;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fammil;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fammil;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fammil;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fammil;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fammil;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fammil;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fammil;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fammil;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammil1;

LEXICON Plurmil
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genmil;
                            Genmil1;
        
LEXICON Fammil
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmil;
                       Genmil;
LEXICON Fammil1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmil;
                       Genmil;

LEXICON Genmil
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemil;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemil;
                       Casemil;
LEXICON Genmil1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casemil;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemil;
                       Casemil1;
 

LEXICON Num
fél AddNum;
feles AddNumat;
egy AddNum;
egyes AddNumat;
kettes AddNumat;
kettős AddNumat;
hármas AddNumat;
négyes AddNumat;
ötös AddNumat;
hat AddNum;
hatos AddNumat;
hetes AddNumat;
nyolcas AddNumat;
kilenc AddNum; 
kilences AddNumat;
elseje AddNum;
másodika AddNum;
harmadika AddNum;
negyedike AddNum;
ötödike AddNum;
hatodika AddNum;
hetedike AddNum;
nyolcadika AddNum;
kilencedike AddNum;
tizedike AddNum;
tizenegyedike AddNum;
tizenkettedike AddNum;
tizenharmadika AddNum;
tizennegyedike AddNum;
tizenötödike AddNum;
tizenhatodika AddNum;
tizenhetedike AddNum;
tizennyolcadika AddNum;
tizenkilencedike AddNum;
huszadika AddNum;
huszonegyedike AddNum;
huszonkettedike AddNum;
huszonharmadika AddNum;
huszonnegyedike AddNum;
huszonötödike AddNum;
huszonhatodika AddNum;
huszonhetedike AddNum;
huszonnyolcadika AddNum;
huszonkilencedike AddNum;
harmincadika AddNum;
harmincegyedike AddNum;
